District of Columbia statutes.
46-505

Amendment; revocation.

After marriage or the registration of a domestic partnership under § 32-702, a premarital agreement may be amended or revoked only by a written agreement signed by the parties. The amended agreement or the revocation is enforceable without consideration.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-82, § 6, 42 DCR 6770
Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-79, § 8(d), 53 DCR 1035

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-145.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-79 substituted “After marriage or the registration of a domestic partnership under § 32-702,” for “After marriage,”.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 5 of the Uniform Premarital Agreement Act.